Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-274
Hearing; legal counsel; powers and duties.

The school board or board of education, acting through the superintendent, may cause legal counsel to be present either for the purpose of acting as the designee of the principal or for the purpose of advising the hearing examiner in the conduct of the hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269. Any legal counsel who acts as the designee of the principal in presenting the school's case against the student shall not advise the hearing examiner on the conduct of the hearing or later advise administrators or board members on the conduct of any appeal, but legal counsel may give advice on technical and procedural aspects of the school's presentation and may advise the hearing examiner and the board as long as the legal counsel does not act as the principal's designee in presenting the school's case.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 18;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,187;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 78.